test/src/morphology/N-mierr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieˊrr a-stem määrä: # Noun - full paradigm
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Nom: mieˊrr
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Gen: meäˊr
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Acc: meäˊr
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Ill: meärra
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Loc: meäˊrest
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Com: meäˊrin
     mieˊrr+N+Ess: mieˊrren
     mieˊrr+N+Par: mieˊrred
     mieˊrr+N+Sg+Abe: meäˊrtää
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Nom: meäˊr
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Gen: meäˊri
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Acc: meäˊrid
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Ill: meäˊrid
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Loc: meäˊrin
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Com: meäˊrivuiˊm
     mieˊrr+N+Pl+Abe: meäˊritää
